Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1627.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 48.43 RCW to read as follows:For health plans, including dental only and vision only plans, issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2026, any health carrier that requires any annual covered service to be provided at least 12 months following the previous service shall provide coverage for that service to allow an enrollee to obtain the covered service at least one month before 12 months have elapsed since the previous service was provided and apply the same cost-sharing requirements that would have been applied if the service occurred after 12 months had elapsed. For any covered service that a health carrier covers biennially or at another multiyear frequency, the health carrier shall provide coverage to allow an enrollee to obtain the covered service at least one month before that frequency has elapsed since the enrollee's previous covered service and apply the same cost-sharing requirements that would have been applied if the service occurred after the applicable period had elapsed.Sec. 2. RCW 41.05.017 and 2024 c 251 s 5 and 2024 c 242 s 10 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:Each health plan that provides medical insurance offered under this chapter, including plans created by insuring entities, plans not subject to the provisions of Title 48 RCW, and plans created under RCW 41.05.140, are subject to the provisions of RCW 48.43.500, 70.02.045, 48.43.505 through 48.43.535, 48.43.537, 48.43.545, 48.43.550, 70.02.110, 70.02.900, 48.43.190, 48.43.083, 48.43.0128, 48.43.780, 48.43.435, 48.43.815, 48.200.020 through 48.200.280, 48.200.300 through 48.200.320, 48.43.440, section 1 of this act, and chapter 48.49 RCW.--- END ---